District of Columbia statutes.
4-221.01

Severability.

Should a court of competent jurisdiction hold any provision of this chapter to be invalid, then the remaining provision of the chapter shall be considered to be severable and given full effect.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 2201, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-221.1.